Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-345.02
Flare cards; punchboards; posting; identification.

(1) Licensed organizations and pickle card operators selling individual pickle cards or punchboards shall conspicuously post the flare card for each pickle card unit in play at that location.

(2) Licensed organizations and pickle card operators shall identify each flare card or punchboard in a manner prescribed by the department indicating the name and state identification number of each nonprofit organization on behalf of which individual pickle cards and punches from punchboards are sold at such location.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 29;

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 41.